Utah statutes.
32B-4-503.   Tampering with a record.

(1)  It is unlawful for a person who has custody of a record required to be filed or deposited with the commission or the department under this title to:

(a)  steal, falsify, alter, willfully destroy, mutilate, deface, remove, or conceal in whole or in part that record; or

(b)  knowingly permit another person to take an action described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a third degree felony if that person is a commissioner, the director, or a department employee.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

